Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF246.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin HENNEPIN COUNTY; ST. DAVID'S CENTER.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $10,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of human services for a grant to Hennepin County to predesign, design, construct, furnish, and equip the expansion and renovation of the St. David's Center facility located at 1130 Nicollet Mall in the city of Minneapolis, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.695. The facility must be used to promote the public welfare by providing early childhood education, children's mental health and pediatric therapy services, and support services that stabilize families, build skills, increase independence, and improve the educational and health outcomes of Minnesotans. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. Nonstate money spent on the project since January 1, 2024, shall be included in the determination of any required nonstate commitments to the project. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $10,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end